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DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART
HINT:
If a malfunction code is displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit indicated by the DTC. For details
of each code, turn to the page for the respective ”DTC No.” in the DTC chart.
DTC chart of VGRS system:

DTC No.
(See Page)

Detection Item Trouble Area

C1511/11
(DI−11 4 )

Steering angle sensor malfunction

SSteering angle sensor
SSteering angle sensor circuit
SVGRS ECU
SSkid control ECU

C1515/15
(DI−123)

VGRS actuator neutral position is not initialized
SVGRS actuator
SVGRS ECU

C1516/16
(DI−124)

VGRS actuator neutral position incomplete
SVGRS actuator
SVGRS ECU

C1521/21
(DI−126)

C1522/22
(DI−128)

VGRS t t lf ti
SVGRS actuator

C1527/27
(DI−130)

VGRS actuator malfunction
SVGRS actuator
SVGRS ECU

C1528/28
(DI−130)

C1531/31
(DI−133)

C1532/32
(DI−134)

VGRS ECU malfunction SVGRS ECU

C1533/33
(DI−135)

C1541/41
(DI−137)

Vehicle skid control system malfunction
SVSC system
SVGRS ECU
SSkid control ECU

C1549/49
(DI−140)

Vehicle skid control system communication malfunction
SWire harness and connector
SVGRS ECU
SSkid control ECU

C1551/51
(DI−144)

IG power source voltage malfunction

SECU−IG fuse
S IG circuit
SCharging system
SVGRS ECU

C1552/52
(DI−146)

DC motor power source voltage
SVGRS fuse
SPower source circuit
SVGRS ECU

C1554/54
(DI−148)

Power source relay failure
SVGRS fuse
SVGRS ECU

C1555/55
(DI−150)

Predriver malfunction
SPower source circuit
SVGRS ECU

C1561/61
(DI−152)

Lock mechanism malfunction
SVGRS actuator
SVGRS ECU

C1567/67
(DI−154)

Lock mechanism insertion malfunction
SVGRS actuator
SVGRS ECU
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C1568/68
(DI−156)

Lock holder deviation detection SVGRS actuator

C1569/69
(DI−158)

Lock mechanism release incomplete SVGRS actuator


